California, session 20252026, AB698.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 37100.6 is added to the Government Code, to read:37100.6. Before a legislative body, including, but not limited to, the legislative body of a charter city, adopts any transfer tax on the sale of real property, the legislative body shall develop and post on its internet website an analysis that examines, at a minimum, the effect of the proposed transfer tax on all of the following:(a) The production of affordable housing, including affordable housing produced by market-rate housing projects.(b) The production of market-rate housing units.(c) Property tax revenue for the city, county, state, and any relevant special districts.SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that (a) property tax receipts are reduced by fewer property sales and that a reduction in property tax has a countywide impact, and (b) the provision of adequate housing, in light of the severe shortage of housing at all income levels in this state, are matters of statewide concern and are not municipal affairs as that term is used in Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution. Therefore, Section 1 of this act adding Section 37100.6 to the Government Code applies to all cities, including charter cities.